Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB901.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 40 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 41DISCLOSURE OF ADDICTION TREATMENT COVERAGESec.4101. Purpose of chapter.4102. Definitions.4103. Bi-annual notice.4104. Administrative penalties.4105. Applicability of other law.§ 4101. Purpose of chapter.The purpose of this chapter is to require the complete and proper disclosure and transparency of addiction services covered 12345678910111213141516171819 by policies issued to policy holders.§ 4102. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:" Insurer. " As follows: (1) An entity that issues or administers health insurance policies or health plans and is subject to the jurisdiction of the department.(2) The term includes an entity organized or existing under, or subject to, any of the following:(i) The act of May 17, 1921 (P.L.682, No.284), known as The Insurance Company Law of 1921.(ii) The act of December 29, 1972 (P.L.1701, No.364), known as the Health Maintenance Organization Act.(iii) The act of May 18, 1976 (P.L.123, No.54), known as the Individual Accident and Sickness Insurance Minimum Standards Act.(iv) Chapter 61 (relating to hospital plan corporations) or 63 (relating to professional health services plan corporations).§ 4103. Bi-annual notice.(a) Explanation of coverage.--The department shall direct each insurer to provide members and insureds with a notice twice per calendar year explaining the coverage for addiction treatment services covered under the policy or plan.(b) Requirement for notice.--A notice issued under this chapter shall:(1) Be no more than two pages.20250SB0901PN1041 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) Contain language that is nontechnical and readily understandable.(3) Explain the following:(i) The coverage available for each level of addiction treatment licensed by the Commonwealth, including:(A) Hospital and nonhospital detoxification.(B) Hospital and nonhospital residential rehabilitation, outpatient, partial hospitalization and halfway houses.(ii) Lengths of stay available for each level of care under subparagraph (i).(iii) The process to access covered services.(iv) The process to file an appeal or a grievance.(v) Avenues for accessing available public funding if necessary.(c) Review of notice.--Before an insurer provides a notice under this chapter, the insurer shall submit the notice for review for clarity, accuracy and approval to the Department of Drug and Alcohol Programs. The Department of Drug and Alcohol Programs shall convene representatives from the department, Pennsylvania Recovery Organizations Alliance, the Drug and Alcohol Service Providers Organization of Pennsylvania, parent groups and others to review, approve or disapprove the notice.(d) Approval of notice.--The department and the Department of Drug and Alcohol Programs shall have 45 days to notify the insurer, in writing, of approval of the language contained in the notice under this section. The written approval shall be sent via certified mail, electronic communication or other form of communication that is agreed to by both the insurer and the 20250SB0901PN1041 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 departments and organizations under subsection (c).(e) Disapproval and resolution.--The department and the Department of Drug and Alcohol Programs shall jointly mediate and assist in negotiating a resolution to any disputes over language in the notification that cannot be resolved.§ 4104. Administrative penalties.The failure of an insurer to comply with section 4103 (relating to bi-annual notice) shall result in a fine or other penalty as the department determines.§ 4105. Applicability of other law.Section 303 of the act of December 18, 1996 (P.L.1066, No.159), known as the Accident and Health Filing Reform Act, shall not apply to a notice under this chapter.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0901PN1041 - 4 - 1234567891011121314